Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.870

Zoning adjustor—Powers and duties.

If the office of zoning adjustor is established as provided in this chapter, all of the provisions of this chapter defining the powers, duties, and procedures of the board of adjustment shall also apply to the zoning adjustor.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.870. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 87.]